Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,165
Body art; consent required; when; violation; penalty.

No person shall perform body art on or to any person under eighteen years of age without the prior written consent of the parent or court-appointed guardian of such person. The person giving such consent must be present during the procedure. A copy of such consent shall be retained for a period of five years by the person performing such body art. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the performance of body art on a person under eighteen years of age. Violation of this section is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 34;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-3,236;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 427.